Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB922.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the physician recruitment and retention
program to encourage Kentucky medical school students to stay in Kentucky to
practice medicine upon graduation.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) "Eligible medical institution" means a nonprofit medical institution located
in Kentucky;
(c) "Eligible medical school" means a public medical school in Kentucky;
(d) "Eligible medical student" means a student who:
1. Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
2. Is a Kentucky resident, as determined by the participating institution
in accordance with criteria established by the Council on
Postsecondary Education for the purposes of admission and tuition
assessment;
3. Has graduated or is graduating from an eligible medical school; and
4. Meets any other criteria established in administrative regulations
promulgated by the authority; and
(e) "Qualified medical service" means full-time employment of forty (40) or
more hours per week as a physician providing medical services at an
eligible medical institution.
(3) The authority may, to the extent of appropriations and other funds available to it
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, award medical school loan interest
amounts to an eligible medical student for the first five (5) years after medical
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2482
school completion and award a sum of twenty percent (20%) of the loan principal
and interest amounts for each of the subsequent five (5) years in accordance with
subsection (4) of this section. Each award shall be evidenced by a promissory
note that requires repayment or cancellation pursuant to subsection (5) of this
section.
(4) Physician recruitment and retention program awards shall be provided to eligible
medical students who agree to qualified medical service. To the extent funds are
available, the authority shall provide eligible medical students a maximum award,
not to exceed the medical student's total cost of attendance minus other financial
assistance received or expected to be received by the medical student during
medical school.
(5) (a) The authority shall disburse awards to eligible medical students who agree
to render qualified medical service and provide documentation of such
service by the eligible medical institution.
(b) An award shall not be provided or a promissory note cancellation shall not
be granted to any person who is in default on any obligation to the authority
under any program administered by the authority pursuant to KRS 164.740
to 164.7870 until financial obligations to the authority are satisfied, except
that ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the authority for cause.
(c) Recipients shall render ten (10) years of qualified medical service.
(d) If the recipient of an award fails to render qualified medical service and the
failure is not temporarily waived for cause by the authority, the recipient
shall immediately become liable to the authority for repayment of the sum
of all outstanding promissory notes and interest accrued. Persons liable for
repayment of awards under this paragraph shall be liable for interest
accruing from the date on which the recipient ceases to render qualified
medical service.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2482
(e) The authority shall establish, by administrative regulation promulgated in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, the terms and conditions, cancellation,
and repayment of awards, including but not limited to the selection criteria,
eligibility for renewal, amount of payments, deferments, the rate of
repayment, and the interest rate thereon.
(f) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the maximum interest
rate applicable to repayment of a promissory note under this section shall be
eight percent (8%) per annum, except that if a judgment is rendered to
recover payment, the judgment shall bear interest at the rate of five percent
(5%) greater than the rate actually charged on the promissory note.
(6) A repayment obligation imposed by this section shall not be voidable by reason of
the age of the recipient at the time of receiving the award.
(7) Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section may be cause for
the revocation of a person's medical license, subject to the discretion of the
Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure.
(8) All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be added to the
appropriations made for purposes of this section, and the funds and unobligated
appropriations shall not lapse.
(9) The authority may execute appropriate contracts and promissory notes for
administering this section.
(10) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, if available funds are
insufficient for all requested awards for eligible medical students during any
fiscal year, the authority shall give priority consideration to eligible medical
students who previously received awards under this section.
(11) The authority shall submit a report on the number of physician recruitment and
retention program awards provided in each fiscal year, the eligible medical
institutions at which recipients are employed, recipient retention rates, total
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2482
number of applications, and recruitment strategies to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committees on Education and
Health Services by December 1 of each year.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 3/3/2026 2:56 PM Jacketed